test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-aladu3_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - aladu: # Adjective (3) aladu 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     aladu+A+Sg+Nom: aladu
     aladu+A+Sg+Gen: aladu
     aladu+A+Sg+Par: alatut
     aladu+A+Sg+Ill: alatuhe
     aladu+A+Pl+Gen: alatuidõ
     aladu+A+Pl+Par: alatuid
     aladu+A+Pl+Ill: alatuihe
     aladu+A+Pl+All: alatuilõ

     aladu+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [alatumb, alatump, alatup]
